Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 4 Independent Military Organizations

30-4-1.
Constitution — Age limits — Enlistment papers.

The independent chartered military organizations shall be constituted as provided, respectively, in their charters, or any amendments thereof. The members of these organizations shall be subject to no age limit other than prescribed respectively by their charters or rules made thereunder and each active member shall be enlisted for a term of at least three (3) years. A copy of the enlistment papers shall be forwarded to the adjutant general and shall be kept on file in his or her office. The adjutant general shall prepare a roll of all active independent chartered military organizations that shall be kept on file in his or her office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 100; G.L. 1956, §

30-4-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 29.

30-4-2.
Field days for range practice.

The governor is authorized and empowered, in his or her discretion, to order a field day annually for each of the independent chartered military organizations for the purpose of visiting the state rifle range in order that all officers and persons may qualify in rifle practice. Organizations having their own rifle range may hold their field day on that range by making application to the governor, who shall issue proper orders giving the required permission, and detail a proper officer to take charge of the rifle practice on the field day.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 101; G.L. 1956, §

30-4-2

.

30-4-3.
Allowances for maintenance of armories.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary for the purpose of heating, lighting, and repairing the armories of the independent chartered military organizations of the state, which sum shall be apportioned as follows:

For the artillery company in the town of Newport, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the Kentish guards, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the train of artillery in the town and county of Bristol, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the naval militia battalion in their armory afloat, the U.S.S. Providence, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the Glocester light infantry in the town of Glocester, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the Pawtuxet rangers in the city of Cranston, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500);

For the Varnum Continentals in the town of East Greenwich, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500); and

For the Federal Blues in the town of Warren, twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 102; G.L. 1956, §

30-4-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 29.

30-4-4.
Allowance for armorer’s expenses.

Each independent chartered military organization of the state that has been entered on the approved active roll of the state adjutant general may also receive annually the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for armorer’s expenses, to be paid in January of each year. The adjutant general shall not allow this sum of five hundred dollars ($500) to be paid unless the functions of the armorer have been properly performed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 103; G.L. 1956, §

30-4-4

; P.L. 1979, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 29.

30-4-5.
Naval militia battalion.

All provisions of this chapter, insofar as they relate to independent chartered military organizations, shall apply to the naval militia battalion manning the sloop U.S.S. Providence in the same manner as they apply to the independent chartered military organizations mentioned in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 183, § 2.

30-4-6.
Retirement of members.

Any enlisted member of an independent chartered military organization who shall have served as an enlisted member for a period of fifteen (15) years may, upon his or her own application to the governor, be placed upon the retired list of enlisted persons and withdrawn from active service.

When an enlisted person of the militia attains the maximum age provided by the charter of the organization in which he or she enlisted or by rules or regulations made thereunder, that person shall be retired from active service or discharged.

Any commissioned officer who shall have served as a commissioned officer in the militia of the state for ten (10) years, or who shall have served as an enlisted person and officer for thirteen (13) years, may, upon his or her own application to the commander-in-chief, be placed upon the retired list of officers and withdrawn from active service with the highest rank attained; provided, however, that any officer who shall have served in the armed forces of the United States or the Rhode Island state guard in time of war, and has also served as a commissioned officer in the militia of this state for ten (10) years, shall be retired with the rank next higher than the highest rank held by that officer; provided, that no officer shall be retired with a rank higher than the rank of colonel. These officers shall be carried on the retired list of the militia and, during any emergency, may be placed on duty by the commander-in-chief.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-4-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 71, § 2.